District of Columbia statutes.
2-1904

Preliminary determination of interpreter’s qualifications.

Before appointing an interpreter, an appointing authority shall make a preliminary determination that the interpreter is able to accurately communicate with and translate information to and from the communication-impaired person involved. If the interpreter is not able to provide effective communication with the communication-impaired person, the appointing authority shall appoint another qualified interpreter.

Jan. 28, 1988, D.C. Law 7-62, § 5, 34 DCR 7426
1981 Ed., § 31-2704.